Hawaii statutes.
§350C-7 Federal participation. The
department shall include a provision for adoption assistance and medical
assistance for which the federal government pays for some or all of the costs
in any state plan made pursuant to the Adoption Assistance and Child Welfare
Act of 1980, Public Law 96-272 or Social Security Act, titles IV(e) or
XIX. [L 1986, c 110, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next